Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 12

Families First Councils

71-5-1201. Establishment.

The commissioner of human services shall appoint a group of citizens in each county of the state to be known as the families first council, whose duty it shall be to assist persons on the temporary assistance program under chapter 3 of this title, in their county to move from public assistance to self-sufficiency. The council shall also provide business and industry with information regarding the program and shall seek feedback regarding operation of the program.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 12, §§71-5-1201 —71-5-1204 (Acts 1917, ch. 373, §§ 1-4; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 14-2101 — 14-2104; T.C.A., §§14-30-101 —14-30-104), concerning job opportunity committees, was repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 27, effective September 1, 1996.

71-5-1202. Membership — Compensation — Meetings — Rules and regulations.

The members of the families first councils shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years and shall be eligible to succeed themselves. The number of members of the families first council in each county shall be determined by the commissioner of human services after considering the recipient population and general population and potential job opportunities in a particular county.

The membership shall be determined by the commissioner of human services, but at least sixty percent (60%) of the membership shall be composed of persons actually engaged in business or industry, and shall further consist of one (1) member who shall be a community religious leader, one (1) member who shall be a person actively engaged in advocacy for low income families, one (1) member who shall be a recipient of temporary assistance and one (1) member who shall be the department of human services area manager for the area. The area manager shall convene meetings no less frequently than once per quarter. The remaining member or members shall be appointed without regard to occupation.

Members shall serve without compensation or reimbursement.

The council shall meet as soon as possible after its appointment and organize by electing from among its membership a chair, a vice chair and a secretary.

To the extent possible, the council's makeup should reflect the ethnic and gender composition of the service population.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 27; 1999, ch. 388, § 1.

71-5-1203. Inventory and coordination of services and opportunities.

The council shall work in cooperation with the local office of the departments of human services and labor and workforce development and other state and local agencies to ascertain what services are available to help temporary assistance recipients become self-sufficient and to endeavor to assure that such services are well coordinated. The council shall also determine what job opportunities exist for such individuals and actively solicit the cooperation of local business and industry and the professions in trying to place such persons in gainful employment.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 27; 1999, ch. 520, § 47.

71-5-1204. Cooperation by state entities.

The departments of human services and labor and workforce development and other state and local agencies are authorized and directed to cooperate to the fullest extent possible with such councils and each other so that the purpose of this part may be accomplished.

Acts 1996, ch. 950, § 27; 1999, ch. 520, § 47.